Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-515
Department of Health and Human Services; investigations; approval or disapproval of application; notice.

In each case the Department of Health and Human Services shall make such investigation and reinvestigations as may be necessary to determine family circumstances and eligibility for assistance payments. Each applicant and recipient shall be notified in writing as to the approval or disapproval of any application, as to the amount of payments awarded, as to any change in the amount of payments awarded, and as to the discontinuance of payments.

Laws 1935, Spec. Sess., c. 30, § 5, p. 186;

Laws 1939, c. 114, § 2, p. 491;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 43-515;

R.S.1943, § 43-515;

Laws 1967, c. 253, § 1, p. 673;

Laws 1977, LB 312, § 1;

Laws 1982, LB 522, § 16;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 168;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 117.